Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2673.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52PREVENTIVE SERVICES COVERAGESec.5201. Scope of chapter.5202. Definitions.5203. Preventive services coverage requirements.5204. Additions and exceptions.5205. Construction.5206. Regulations.5207. Enforcement.§ 5201. Scope of chapter.1234567891011121314151617 This chapter relates to preventive services coverage.§ 5202. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices." The Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention."Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Cost sharing." The share of health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that an enrollee pays out of pocket. The term includes deductibles, coinsurance, copayments and similar charges. The term does not include a premium, a balance billed amount from an out-of-network provider or the cost of a noncovered service."Enrollee." As defined in section 9103 (relating to definitions)."Grandfathered health care plan." As defined in section 9103."Health care provider." A person who is licensed, certified or otherwise regulated to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth."Health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.20260HB2673PN3714 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A fixed indemnity policy.(7) A dental only policy.(8) A vision only policy.(9) A workers' compensation policy.(10) An automobile medical payment policy.(11) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents.(12) A hospital indemnity policy.(13) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits."Immunization." A vaccine or other immunizing agent. The term includes vaccines or other immunizing agents required to be covered by an individual health insurance policy approved to be offered or issued in this Commonwealth on January 1, 2025."Insurer." As defined in section 9103."Out-of-network provider." A health care provider who does not contract with an insurer to provide health care services to an enrollee under a health insurance policy."Preventive service." A health care service that is on the preventive services list."Preventive services list." A list of health care services compiled by the department that includes health care services:(1) Required to be covered by an individual health insurance policy approved to be offered or issued in this Commonwealth on January 1, 2025, as a preventive service in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-13 (relating to coverage of preventive health services), other than any health care 20260HB2673PN3714 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 service exempted by the department under the modification process under section 5204 (relating to additions and exceptions).(2) Added by the department under the modification process under section 5204.§ 5203. Preventive services coverage requirements.An insurer offering, issuing or renewing a health insurance policy shall provide coverage and may not impose any cost-sharing requirements for services on the preventive services list. This section shall not apply to a grandfathered health care plan.§ 5204. Additions and exceptions.(a) Authority of department.--The department may, in consultation with the Department of Health, add or except a preventive service from the preventive services list if the Department of Health makes a determination consistent with the requirements of this section.(b) Additions to preventive services list.--The department may add a preventive service to the preventive services list and establish the manner and frequency of the service's administration based on a determination by the Department of Health of at least one of the following:(1) The service is then-currently:(i) an evidence-based item or service that has in effect a rating of "A" or "B" by the United States Preventive Services Task Force;(ii) a recommended immunization by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices; or(iii) a preventive care or screening for women, infants, children or adolescents provided for in the 20260HB2673PN3714 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 comprehensive guidelines supported by the United States Health Resources and Services Administration.(2) Both of the following criteria are met:(i) Application of the preventive service is supported by medical evidence.(ii) Application of the preventive service would promote the public health within this Commonwealth.(c) Report to support addition.--In making a determination under subsection (b)(2), the Department of Health may consider guidance and recommendations from additional medical and scientific organizations, including, but not limited to:(1) The American Academy of Pediatrics.(2) The American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.(3) The American College of Physicians.(4) The American Academy of Family Physicians.(5) The Infectious Diseases Society of America.(6) The Society for Maternal-Fetal Medicine.(7) The American Cancer Society.(8) The American Heart Association.(d) Exceptions to preventive services list.--(1) The department may except a preventive service from the preventive services list following a determination by the Department of Health that the application of the preventive service is no longer:(i) supported by medical evidence; and(ii) effective to advance the public health in this Commonwealth.(2) The Department of Health may consider a report from any of the entities identified under subsection (b) or (c) as 20260HB2673PN3714 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 evidence to support a determination under paragraph (1).(e) Notice requirement.--After a determination by the Department of Health, the department shall provide notice of the determination and the addition or exception of a preventive service from the preventive services list in the following manner:(1) Transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The notice shall include a public comment period, which shall be for not less than 15 business days following the date of publication.(2) Post the notice on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Electronically send the notice to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Insurance Committee of the House of Representatives.(f) Effective date of addition or exception.--(1) An addition under subsection (b) shall apply as follows:(i) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the department, an addition shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this subparagraph.(ii) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the department, an addition shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date 20260HB2673PN3714 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this subparagraph.(2) An exception under subsection (d) shall apply as of the date of publication of the notice specified in subsection (e).§ 5205. Construction.(a) In general.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to diminish any other law that limits cost sharing for a health care service or to prohibit an insurer from:(1) Providing coverage for preventive services in addition to those on the preventive services list.(2) Denying coverage for preventive services not subject to this chapter.(3) Using reasonable medical management techniques to determine the frequency, method, treatment or setting for a preventive service, based on relevant clinical evidence, to the extent not specified in:(i) the relevant Federal recommendation or guideline supporting the preventive service as of January 1, 2025; or(ii) the Department of Health determination adding a new preventive service to the preventive services list.(b) Network considerations.--For an insurer that uses a network of health care providers to provide preventive services under a health insurance policy:(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:(i) require the insurer to provide coverage for a preventive service that is delivered by an out-of-network provider; or(ii) preclude the insurer from imposing cost-sharing 20260HB2673PN3714 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements for a preventive service that is delivered by an out-of-network provider.(2) If the insurer does not have an in-network health care provider who can provide a preventive service to an enrollee, the insurer shall cover the preventive service when performed by an out-of-network provider and may not impose cost sharing.(c) Protections.--Nothing in this chapter shall require a health insurance policy to cover a preventive service if the enrollee is exempt by the exercise of the enrollee's constitutional protections of religious freedom under the act of December 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, No.214), known as the Religious Freedom Protection Act, or 42 U.S.C. Ch. 21B (relating to religious freedom restoration).§ 5206. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.§ 5207. Enforcement.(a) Penalties.--Upon a showing of satisfactory evidence of an insurer's violation of this chapter, one or more of the following penalties may be imposed at the commissioner's discretion:(1) Suspension or revocation of the offending insurer's license.(2) Refusal, for a period not to exceed one year, to issue a new license to the offending insurer.(3) A fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation of this chapter.(4) A fine of not more than $10,000 for each willful violation of this chapter.20260HB2673PN3714 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Limitation.--Fines imposed against an insurer under this section may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Additional remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including:(1) The act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. A violation of this chapter shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(2) The act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act.(3) The act of June 25, 1997 (P.L.295, No.29), known as the Pennsylvania Health Care Insurance Portability Act.(d) Administrative procedure.--The administrative provisions of this chapter shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies). A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 2. All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2673PN3714 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526